csv2yaml/yaml_output/VTA_Imp_C.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     ganawaabam+VTA+Imp+NA+Del+2Pl+1Sg: ganawaabamishiikeg
     ganawaabam+VTA+Imp+NA+Del+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: ganawaabamishiikeg
     ganawaabam+VTA+Imp+NA+Del+2Pl+3SgProx/3PlProx: ganawaabamaakang
     ganawaabam+VTA+Imp+NA+Del+2Sg+1Sg: ganawaabamishiikan
     ganawaabam+VTA+Imp+NA+Del+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: ganawaabamimaakan
     ganawaabam+VTA+Imp+NA+Del+2Sg+3SgProx/3PlProx: ganawaabamaakan
     ganawaabam+VTA+Imp+NA+Del+2Sg/2Pl+Excl: MISSING
     ganawaabam+VTA+Imp+NA+Del+Incl+3PlProx: ganawaabamaakang
     ganawaabam+VTA+Imp+NA+Del+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: ganawaabamimaakang
     ganawaabam+VTA+Imp+NA+Del+Incl+3SgProx: ganawaabamaakang
     ganawaabam+VTA+Imp+NA+Prb+2Pl+1Sg: ganawaabamishikegon
     ganawaabam+VTA+Imp+NA+Prb+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: ganawaabamimaakegon
     ganawaabam+VTA+Imp+NA+Prb+2Pl+3SgProx/3PlProx: ganawaabamaakegon
     ganawaabam+VTA+Imp+NA+Prb+2Sg+1Sg: ganawaabamishiken
     ganawaabam+VTA+Imp+NA+Prb+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: ganawaabamimaaken
     ganawaabam+VTA+Imp+NA+Prb+2Sg+3SgProx/3PlProx: ganawaabamaaken
     ganawaabam+VTA+Imp+NA+Prb+2Sg/2Pl+Excl: ganawaabamishikaangen
     ganawaabam+VTA+Imp+NA+Prb+Incl+3PlProx: [ganawaabamaasiwaadaanig,ganawaabamaasiidaanig]
     ganawaabam+VTA+Imp+NA+Prb+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: ganawaabamimaasiwaadaa
     ganawaabam+VTA+Imp+NA+Prb+Incl+3SgProx: [ganawaabamaasiwaadaa,ganawaabamaasiidaa]
     ganawaabam+VTA+Imp+NA+Sim+2Pl+1Sg: ganawaabamishik
     ganawaabam+VTA+Imp+NA+Sim+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: ganawaabamimik
     ganawaabam+VTA+Imp+NA+Sim+2Pl+3SgProx/3PlProx: ganawaabamik
     ganawaabam+VTA+Imp+NA+Sim+2Sg+1Sg: ganawaabamishin
     ganawaabam+VTA+Imp+NA+Sim+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: ganawaabamim
     ganawaabam+VTA+Imp+NA+Sim+2Sg+3SgProx/3PlProx: ganawaabam
     ganawaabam+VTA+Imp+NA+Sim+2Sg/2Pl+Excl: [ganawaabamishinaan,ganawaabamishinaang]
     ganawaabam+VTA+Imp+NA+Sim+Incl+3PlProx: ganawaabamaadaanig
     ganawaabam+VTA+Imp+NA+Sim+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: ganawaabamimaadaa
     ganawaabam+VTA+Imp+NA+Sim+Incl+3SgProx: ganawaabamaadaa
